Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.017

"Eligible student" defined.

"Eligible student" means a student who (1) was enrolled in a Washington college, university, community college, or vocational-technical institute on or after August 2, 1990, and (2) is unable to complete the period of enrollment or academic term in which the student was enrolled because the student was deployed either in the Persian Gulf combat zone, as designated by the president of the United States by executive order, or in another location in support of the Persian Gulf combat zone. An eligible student is required to verify his or her inability to complete an academic term through military service records, movement orders, or a certified letter signed by the student's installation personnel officer.

[ 1991 c 164 s 1.]